Arkansas, session 2025, HB1318.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 3-4-601(10), concerning the excursion train
permit under general alcoholic beverage permits, is amended to read as
follows:
(10) Excursion train permit or excursion boat permit.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 3-4-612 is amended to read as follows:
3-4-612. Excursion train permit or excursion boat permit — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Alcoholic beverage” means spirituous liquor, vinous liquor,
small farm wine, light wine, malt liquor, and hard cider; and
(2) "Excursion boat" means a boat made available to the public
through ticket sales for scheduled dates and times for operation over a
navigable body of water on a fixed schedule or route with a specific
beginning and ending point; and
(2) (3) “Excursion train” means a train made available to the
public through ticket sales for scheduled dates and times for operation over
a common carrier railroad or railroad authority that operates on a fixed
*CRH027*
01/30/2025 10:42:03 AM CRH027

HB1318
schedule or route with a specific beginning and ending point.
(b) An operator of an excursion train operator or an excursion boat
may apply to the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division for a
permit to sell and serve alcoholic beverages on an excursion train or
excursion boat operated in this state.
(c) An application under this section shall be in writing and verified
and shall detail information concerning the applicant for the permit and the
premises to be used by the applicant as the director shall require.
(d) If the director grants an application for a permit under this
section, he or she shall issue the permit in a form prescribed by rule.
(e) A permit under this section shall:
(1) Contain a description of the excursion train or excursion
boat to be used by the operator of an excursion train operator or excursion
boat; and
(2) Permit the applicant to sell and serve alcoholic beverages
on the excursion train or excursion boat as authorized under this section.
(f) Upon receipt of a permit under this section, an operator of an
excursion train operator or excursion boat may:
(1) Sell and serve alcoholic beverages for on-premises
consumption during legal operating hours to a ticketed passenger of legal age
or to an individual of legal age attending a chartered event on the excursion
train or excursion boat;
(2) Store legally purchased alcoholic beverages on the excursion
train or excursion boat to sell and serve to customers for on-premises
consumption; and
(3) Store legally purchased alcoholic beverages at a separate
facility as needed to meet the demand of customers.
(g) An operator of an excursion train operator or excursion boat shall
pay an annual permit fee of two hundred dollars ($200) for an excursion train
permit or an excursion boat permit.
(h) An A holder of an excursion train permit holder or a holder of an
excursion boat permit shall ensure that a copy of the excursion train permit
or excursion boat permit issued under this section is posted in each
excursion train or excursion boat operated by the holder of the excursion
train permit holder or the excursion boat permit where alcoholic beverages
are sold and served.
01/30/2025 10:42:03 AM CRH027

HB1318
(i) An A holder of an excursion train permit holder or holder of an
excursion boat permit is authorized to sell and serve alcoholic beverages
only when the excursion train or excursion boat is located in a territory
that has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages.
(j) The director shall adopt rules to implement and administer this
section.






























01/30/2025 10:42:03 AM CRH027